dev/verbs.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="/nākties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nāksies</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nākties</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nācās</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nākas</l>
          <r>nākties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ķ/ert__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eršu</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersim</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersi</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersit</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersiet</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ert</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēru</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ērām</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēri</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ērāt</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēra</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eru</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eram</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erat</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="j/ust__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utīšu</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utīsim</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utīsi</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utīsit</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utīsiet</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utīs</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ust</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utu</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utām</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uti</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utāt</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uta</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūtu</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūtam</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūti</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūtat</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ūt</l>
          <r>ust<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pieķert"><i>pieķ</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ķert"><i>ķ</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nākties"><i></i><par n="/nākties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sajust"><i>saj</i><par n="j/ust__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apķert"><i>apķ</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzķert"><i>uzķ</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dzert"><i>dz</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izjust"><i>izj</i><par n="j/ust__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saķert"><i>saķ</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uztvert"><i>uztv</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="just"><i>j</i><par n="j/ust__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izķert"><i>izķ</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izdzert"><i>izdz</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aptvert"><i>aptv</i><par n="ķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
